Hawaii statutes.
[§482D-3] Standard of fineness of gold
articles; deviation. The actual fineness of gold or alloy shall not be
less by more than .003 parts than the fineness indicated by the mark stamped
upon any part of the article; provided, however, that:

(1) In any test for the ascertainment of the fineness
of any article mentioned in this chapter, the part of the article taken for the
test, shall be the portion as does not contain any solder or alloy of inferior
fineness used for brazing or uniting the parts of the article; and

(2) The actual fineness of the entire quantity of
gold or of its alloys contained in an article including all solder and alloy of
inferior fineness used for brazing or uniting the parts of the article (all
gold, alloys, and solder being assayed as one piece), shall not be less by more
than .003 parts, in the case of a watchcase or flatware, or than .007 parts, in
the case of any other article, than the fineness indicated by the mark stamped
upon the article. [L 1990, c 343, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next